North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3B. State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 135-48.1.
General definitions.

As used in this Article unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

Authorized representatives who are assisting the State Health Plan Division staff. — Staff of the Department of the State Treasurer, staff of the Department of Justice, or persons providing internal auditing assistance required under G.S. 143-746(b).

(1a)
Benefit period. — The period of time during which charges for covered services provided to a Plan member must be incurred in order to be eligible for payment by the Plan.

Chemical dependency. — The pathological use or abuse of alcohol or other drugs in a manner or to a degree that produces an impairment in personal, social, or occupational functioning and which may, but need not, include a pattern of tolerance and withdrawal.

(2a)
Claims Data Feed. — An electronic file provided by a Claims Processor that contains all claims processing data elements for every claim processed by the Claims Processor for the Plan, including Claim Payment Data
for each claim.

(2b)
Claim Payment Data. — Data fields within a Claims Data Feed that reflect the provider and the amount the provider billed for services provided to a Plan member, the allowed amount applied to the claim by the Claims
Processor, and the amount paid by the Plan on the claim. The term “Claim Payment Data” includes any document, material, or other work, whether tangible or electronic, that is derived from, is based on, or reflects any of the
foregoing data fields or information contained therein. If the Claims Processor designates Claim Payment Data as a trade secret, the Claim Payment Data shall be treated as a trade secret as defined in G.S. 66-152(3).

Claims Processor. — One or more administrators, third-party administrators, or other parties contracting with the Plan to administer Plan benefits.

Comprehensive group health benefit plan. — A comprehensive health benefit plan offered to an individual because of an employment, organizational, or other group affiliation.

Comprehensive health benefit plan. — Health care coverage that consists of inpatient and outpatient hospital and medical benefits, as well as other outpatient medical services, prescription drugs, medical supplies, and equipment that are generally available
in the health insurance market.

Covered service; benefit; allowable expense. — Any medically necessary, reasonable, and customary items of service, including prescription drugs, and medical supplies included in the Plan.

Deductible. — The dollar amount that must be incurred for certain covered services in a benefit period before benefits are payable by the Plan.

Dependent. — An eligible Plan member other than the subscriber.

Dependent child. — Subject to the eligibility requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of

G.S. 135-48.41

, any of the following up to the first month following the dependent child’s 26th birthday:

A natural or legally adopted child or children of the employee, whether or not the child is living with the employee.

A foster child or children of the employee, whether or not the child is living with the employee.

A child for which an employee is a court-appointed guardian.

A stepchild of a member who is married to the stepchild’s natural parent.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-96, s. 3(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Employee or State employee. — Any permanent full-time or permanent part-time regular employee (designated as half-time or more) of an employing unit.

Employing Unit. — A North Carolina School System; Community College; State Department, Agency, or Institution; Administrative Office of the Courts; or Association or Examining Board whose employees are eligible for membership in a State-Supported Retirement
System. An employing unit also shall mean (i) a charter school in accordance with Article 14A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes whose board of directors elects to become a participating employer in the Plan under

G.S. 135-48.54

or (ii) a local government unit that participates in the Plan under

G.S. 135-48.47

or under any other law. Bona fide fire departments, rescue or emergency medical service squads, and National Guard units are deemed to be employing units for the purpose of providing benefits under this Article.

Firefighter. — A member of the group “eligible firefighter” as defined in

G.S. 58-86-2

.

Health Benefits Representative or HBR. — The employee designated by the employing unit to administer the Plan for the unit and its employees. The HBR is responsible for enrolling new employees and dependents in accordance with the eligibility requirements
under this Article, reporting changes, explaining benefits, reconciling group statements, and remitting group fees. The State Retirement System is the Health Benefits Representative for retired State employees.

Plan or State Health Plan. — The North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees. Depending on the context, the term may refer to the entity created in

G.S. 135-48.2

or to the health benefit plans offered by the entity, in which case “Plan” includes all comprehensive health benefit plans offered under the Plan.

Plan member. — A subscriber or dependent who is eligible and currently enrolled in the Plan and for whom a premium is paid.

Predecessor plan. — The Hospital and Medical Benefits for the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System of the State of North Carolina and the North Carolina Teachers’ and State Employees’ Comprehensive Major Medical Plan.

Rescue squad worker. — An “eligible rescue squad worker” as defined in

G.S. 58-86-30

.

Retired employee (retiree). — Retired teachers, State employees, and members of the General Assembly who (i) are receiving monthly retirement benefits from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System,
the Legislative Retirement System, or the Optional Retirement Programs established under

G.S. 135-5.1

and

G.S. 135-5.4

and (ii) earned contributory retirement service in one of these retirement systems prior to January 1, 2021, and did not withdraw that service, so long as the retiree is enrolled.

Subscriber. — A Plan member who is not a dependent.

History.
2008-168, s. 3(e); 2009-16, s. 3(a); 2009-281, s. 1; 2010-120, s. 1; 2011-85, ss. 1.7(a), 1.10(c), 2.6(b), 2.10; 2011-96, s. 3(a); 2011-183, s. 102; 2011-326, s. 19.3; 2012-173, s. 1; 2014-75, s. 1; 2014-97, s. 5(a); 2014-101,
s. 7; 2016-104, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 35.21(c); 2017-135, s. 5; 2021-125, s. 5.

2009 Health Benefit Changes.

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 2(a), provides: “Eliminate PPO Plus Option. — Effective July 1, 2009, the PPO Plus option (90/10 in-network coverage) under the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees (‘Plan’) is eliminated. The Executive Administrator
shall provide notice to all members of the Plan that this option will no longer be available as of July 1, 2009. Employees enrolled in the Plan’s Plus option shall have the choice of enrolling in the Basic or Standard Plan options
for the 2009-2010 benefit year.”

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 2(h), provides: “Pharmacy Benefit Savings. — The Plan shall direct its pharmacy benefit manager (PBM), within the terms of the Plan’s PBM contract, to achieve the sum of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) in savings in pharmacy
benefit costs in the 2009-2010 fiscal year, and the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in savings in pharmacy benefit costs in the 2010-2011 fiscal year through reduced reimbursements paid to pharmacies for prescription drugs.
If the savings achieved in each six-month period of the fiscal year do not exceed one hundred five percent (105%) of the savings amount specified in this section for that fiscal year, there shall be no further adjustment to reimbursements
paid to pharmacies for that six-month period. If the total savings achieved, by fiscal year, exceeds one hundred five percent (105%) of the specified savings amount in each six-month period of the fiscal year, the Plan shall adjust
pharmacy reimbursement reductions accordingly. The Plan shall review savings achieved twice annually to ensure compliance with this section. The Plan shall calculate the savings to be achieved based on Plan enrollment and estimated
cost and utilization trends incorporated in the Plan’s Financial Projections as of March 20, 2009. The total savings by fiscal year achieved in this section may be increased or decreased without adjustment based on a change in total
enrollment provided that the rate of savings achieved on a per-member per-month basis remains constant. Not later than 60 days immediately following each six-month period, the Plan shall report the amount of savings achieved and any
adjustments made for that period to the Committee on Employee Hospital and Medical Benefits.”

§ 135-48.2.
Undertaking.

The State of North Carolina undertakes to make available a State Health Plan (hereinafter called the “Plan”) exclusively for the benefit of eligible employees, eligible retired employees, and certain of their eligible dependents, which will pay benefits
in accordance with the terms of this Article. The Plan shall have all the powers and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees. The State Treasurer, Executive Administrator,
and Board of Trustees shall carry out their duties and responsibilities as fiduciaries for the Plan. The Plan shall administer one or more group health plans that are comprehensive in coverage. The State Treasurer may operate group
plans as a preferred provider option, or health maintenance, point-of-service, or other organizational arrangement.

Payroll deduction shall be available for coverage under the Plan for subscribers able to meet the Plan’s requirements for payroll deduction.

History.
2008-168, s. 3(c); 2009-16, ss. 2(f), 5(h); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-313, s. 2; 2010-194, s. 18(b); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(a), 2.10.

2009 Health Benefit Changes.

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 2(a), provides: “Eliminate PPO Plus Option. — Effective July 1, 2009, the PPO Plus option (90/10 in-network coverage) under the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees (‘Plan’) is eliminated. The Executive Administrator
shall provide notice to all members of the Plan that this option will no longer be available as of July 1, 2009. Employees enrolled in the Plan’s Plus option shall have the choice of enrolling in the Basic or Standard Plan options
for the 2009-2010 benefit year.”

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 2(h), provides: “Pharmacy Benefit Savings. — The Plan shall direct its pharmacy benefit manager (PBM), within the terms of the Plan’s PBM contract, to achieve the sum of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) in savings in pharmacy
benefit costs in the 2009-2010 fiscal year, and the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in savings in pharmacy benefit costs in the 2010-2011 fiscal year through reduced reimbursements paid to pharmacies for prescription drugs.
If the savings achieved in each six-month period of the fiscal year do not exceed one hundred five percent (105%) of the savings amount specified in this section for that fiscal year, there shall be no further adjustment to reimbursements
paid to pharmacies for that six-month period. If the total savings achieved, by fiscal year, exceeds one hundred five percent (105%) of the specified savings amount in each six-month period of the fiscal year, the Plan shall adjust
pharmacy reimbursement reductions accordingly. The Plan shall review savings achieved twice annually to ensure compliance with this section. The Plan shall calculate the savings to be achieved based on Plan enrollment and estimated
cost and utilization trends incorporated in the Plan’s Financial Projections as of March 20, 2009. The total savings by fiscal year achieved in this section may be increased or decreased without adjustment based on a change in total
enrollment provided that the rate of savings achieved on a per-member per-month basis remains constant. Not later than 60 days immediately following each six-month period, the Plan shall report the amount of savings achieved and any
adjustments made for that period to the Committee on Employee Hospital and Medical Benefits.”

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 7(a)-(f), as amended by Session Laws 2009-571, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.33(a), provides: “(a) State Health Plan Blue Ribbon Task Force. — There is established the Blue Ribbon Task Force on the State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees (Task Force). The purpose of the Task Force is to review the governance of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees (Plan) and to make recommendations for changes that will ensure
the ongoing financial stability of the Plan, increase and maintain high participation rates for dependent coverage under the Plan, study and compare coverage and costs of the Plan to coverage and costs of other State health plans in
the region, and address issues of cost, quality, and access to health care coverage under the Plan. In conducting its review of the Plan the Task Force shall consider all of the following:

“(1) The feasibility of transferring the ongoing day-to-day oversight of the Plan to an independent board or to a State agency.

“(2) Tiered premium rates for member-only coverage for employees and future retirees based on income or ability to pay.

“(3) Ways to increase participation in dependent coverage including supplements from the State or other methods for reducing dependent premiums.

“(4) The benefits of implementing a closed prescription drug formulary.

“(5) Whether it is advisable to move the Plan to a calendar year, the costs involved in the move, and the benefits that accrue to the Plan and the members as a result of moving to a calendar year.

“(6) Any other matters the Task Force considers relevant to its purpose.

“(b) The Task Force shall consist of 15 members, appointed as follows:

“(1) Six members by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, three of whom shall be members of the House of Representatives, one shall be a public schoolteacher, one shall be a State or covered local government retiree other than a retired public
schoolteacher, and one at-large. Of the three legislators appointed to the Task Force, one shall be a member of the minority party.

“(2) Six members by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, three of whom shall be members of the Senate, one shall be a State employee who is not a public schoolteacher, one shall be a retired State public school employee, and one at-large. Of the three
legislators appointed to the Task Force, one shall be a member of the minority party.

“(3) One member by the Governor with expertise in the business of health insurance or in administering health care services other than an insurance company or third-party administrator or contractor of the Plan.

“(4) The chair of the Board of Trustees of the State Health Plan or the chair’s designee.

“(5) The Commissioner of Insurance or the Commissioner’s designee.

“(c) The cochairs of the Task Force shall convene the first meeting as soon as possible after appointments have been made. The Task Force may engage the services of a consultant to provide independent analysis of Plan costs and recommendations on how
to strengthen the Plan’s financial stability, benefit structure and coverage, and the most effective and efficient location for Plan administration.

“(d) The Task force shall terminate on or before July 1, 2011.

“(e) A majority of the Task Force members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall each appoint one Task Force member as chair. Appointments
shall be made as soon as possible after this act becomes law. Task Force members shall receive no compensation for their service but shall be paid per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

,

G.S. 138-5

, and

G.S. 138-6

, as applicable.

“(f) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, 1.33(a), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 135-48.3.
Right to amend.

The General Assembly reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal this Article.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, s. 62; 2008-168, ss. 3(a), (u); 2011-85, s. 2.6(k); 2012-173, s. 5.

§ 135-48.4.
Conflict with federal law.

If any provision of this Article is in conflict with applicable federal law, federal law shall control to the extent of the conflict.

History.
2018-84, s. 7.

§ 135-48.5.
Health benefit trust funds created.

There are hereby established two health benefit trust funds, to be known as the Public Employee Health Benefit Fund and the Health Benefit Reserve Fund for the payment of hospital and medical benefits. As used in this section, the term “health benefit
trust funds” refers to the fund type described under G.S. 143C-1-3(a)(10).All premiums, fees, charges, rebates, refunds or any other receipts including, but not limited to, earnings on investments, occurring or arising in connection
with health benefits programs established by this Article, shall be deposited into the Public Employee Health Benefit Fund. Disbursements from the Fund shall include any and all amounts required to pay the benefits and administrative
costs of such programs as may be determined by the Executive Administrator and Board of Trustees.Any unencumbered balance in excess of prepaid premiums or charges in the Public Employee Health Benefit Fund at the end of each fiscal
year shall be used in the following order:

First, to provide an actuarially determined Health Benefit Reserve Fund for incurred but unpresented claims.

Second, an amount determined by the State Treasurer, subject to approval by the Board of Trustees, that does not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of any unencumbered balance remaining after providing for incurred but unpresented claims may be transferred
to the Retiree Health Benefit Fund, established under G.S. 135-7(f). Upon the direction and approval of, and in the amount specified by, the State Treasurer, the Office of State Budget Management shall transfer the amount
in accordance with this subdivision.

Third, to reduce the premiums required in providing the benefits of the health benefits programs.

Fourth, to improve the plan, as may be provided by the State Treasurer, subject to approval by the Board of Trustees.The balance in the Health Benefits Reserve Fund may be transferred from time to time to the Public Employee Health Benefit Fund to provide
for any deficiency occurring therein. The Public Employee Health Benefit Fund and the Health Benefit Reserve Fund shall be deposited with the State Treasurer and invested as provided in

G.S. 147-69.2

and

G.S. 147-69.3

.

Disbursement from the Public Employee Health Benefit Fund may be made by warrant drawn on the State Treasurer by the Executive Administrator, or the Executive Administrator and Board of Trustees may by contract authorize the Claims Processors to draw
the warrant.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-173, s. 3(b), effective January 1, 2013.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, ss. 43, 63; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 1997-468, s. 3; 1998-1, s. 4(d); 2008-107, s. 10.13(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (l); 2011-85, s. 2.5(e); 2012-173,
s. 3(b); 2020-48, s. 2.2(b).

§§ 135-48.6,
135-48.7.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.8.
Statements of public interest.

The State of North Carolina deems it to be in the public interest for individual North Carolina firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of the National Guard, and certain of their dependents, who are not eligible for any other type of comprehensive
health insurance or other comprehensive health benefits, and who have been without any form of health insurance or other comprehensive health benefit coverage for at least six consecutive months, to be given the opportunity to
participate in the benefits provided by the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees. Coverage under the Plan shall be voluntary for eligible firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of the National Guard who elect
participation in the Plan for themselves and their eligible dependents.

The State of North Carolina deems it to be in the public interest for local government units to be allowed to join the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees and to participate in the Plan.

History.
2008-168, s. 3(c); 2009-16, ss. 2(f), 5(h); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-313, s. 2; 2010-194, s. 18(b); 2011-85, s. 2.6(a); 2014-75, s. 2; 2015-112, s. 1; 2020-48, s. 1.5(a).

§ 135-48.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.10.
Confidentiality of information and medical records; provider contracts.

Any information described in this section that is in the possession of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees or its Claims Processor under the Plan or the Predecessor Plan shall be confidential and shall be exempt from the provisions
of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes or any other provision requiring information and records held by State agencies to be made public or accessible to the public. This section shall apply to all information concerning individuals,
including the fact of coverage or noncoverage, whether or not a claim has been filed, medical information, whether or not a claim has been paid, and any other information or materials concerning a plan participant, including Claim
Payment Data and any documents or other materials derived from the Claim Payment Data. This information may, however, be released to the State Auditor or to the Attorney General in furtherance of their statutory duties and responsibilities,
or to such persons or organizations as may be designated and approved by the State Treasurer. Any information so released shall remain confidential as stated above and any party obtaining such information shall assume the same
level of responsibility for maintaining such confidentiality as that of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.

The terms of a contract between the Plan and its third party administrator or between the Plan and its pharmacy benefit manager are a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. No provision of law, however, shall be construed to prevent
or restrict the release of any information in a Plan contract to the State Treasurer, the State Auditor, the Attorney General, the Director of the State Budget, the Plan’s Board of Trustees, and the Plan’s Executive Administrator
solely and exclusively for their use in the furtherance of their duties and responsibilities.and after

History.
1981, c. 355; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, ss. 3, 4; 1983, c. 922, s. 21.10; 1985, c. 732, s. 38; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 1998-1, s. 4(h); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(c); 2008-107, s. 10.13(m); 2008-168, s.
1(a), (c), (d); 2009-16, s. 5(f); 2009-83, s. 1; 2010-194, s. 18(a); 2011-85, ss. 1.9(a), 2.4(a), 2.10; 2011-326, s. 15(r); 2016-104, s. 2.

§ 135-48.11.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.12.
Committee on Actuarial Valuation of Retired Employees’ Health Benefits.

There is established the Committee on Actuarial Valuation of Retired Employees’ Health Benefits. The Committee shall be responsible for collecting data and reviewing assumptions for the sole purpose of conducting required actuarial valuations of State
supported retired employees’ health benefits under other post-employment benefit accounting standards set forth by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation.

The Committee on Actuarial Valuation of Retired Employees’ Health Benefits shall consist of five members serving ex officio, as follows:

The State Budget Officer, who shall serve as the Chair;

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-373, s. 1, effective October 1, 2013.

The State Controller;

The State Treasurer; and

The Executive Administrator for the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.

A majority of the members of the Committee then serving shall constitute a quorum.

Each member shall be entitled to one vote on the Committee. Three affirmative votes shall be necessary for a decision by the members at any meeting of the Committee.

The Committee shall keep in convenient form such data as is necessary for actuarial valuation of retired employees’ health benefits under accounting standards set forth by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation.
The Department of State Treasurer, Retirement Systems Division, the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees, and any other State agency, department, or university institution, local public school agency, or local community
college institution shall provide any necessary data upon request of the Committee for the purpose of conducting its responsibilities.

The Committee shall designate either the actuary under contract with the Department of State Treasurer, Retirement Systems Division, or the actuary under contract with the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees as the technical adviser to
the Committee on matters regarding the actuarial valuation of retired employees’ health benefits created by the provisions of this Chapter. The technical advisor shall perform such actuarial valuation and other duties as are required
under this Chapter.

The Committee shall secure an annual calendar-year actuarial valuation of retired employees’ health benefits under accounting standards set forth by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation.

The Committee shall keep a record of all of its proceedings which shall be open to public inspection.

The Committee shall adopt a funding policy and shall include information about the State’s contribution policy, including the basis for determining contributions in the annual actuarial valuation.

History.
2007-467, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2008-168, s. 1(a), (c), (f); 2011-85, ss. 2.4(b), 2.10; 2013-373, s. 1; 2017-125, s. 3.

§§ 135-48.13,
135-48.14.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.15.
Whistle-blower protections related to the State Health Plan.

Statement of Public Policy. — It is the policy of this State that persons shall be encouraged to report verbally or in writing to the State Health Plan, Attorney General, or other appropriate authority evidence of activity related to the State Health
Plan and involving the following:

A violation of State or federal law, rule, or regulation.

Fraud.

Misappropriation of State resources.

Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of monies, or gross abuse of authority.

Further, it is the policy of this State that persons shall be free of intimidation or harassment when reporting matters of public concern related to the State Health Plan, including offering testimony to or testifying before appropriate legislative panels.

(a1) Rules to Further Public Policy. — In accordance with

G.S. 135-48.25

, the State Treasurer may adopt rules to assist in the identification and investigation of activities described under subsection (a) of this section undertaken by a health care provider that provides
services to Plan members. If the Plan adopts a program to encourage its members to report these activities, then the Plan is authorized to expend State funds in furtherance of the policy objectives of this section and
may adopt rules to offer an incentive to Plan members. The incentive offered shall be five hundred dollars ($500.00), or a maximum of twenty percent (20%) of any net recovery made by the Plan resulting from the member
report, whichever amount is less.

Protection From Retaliation. — No employer shall sue, discharge, threaten, or otherwise discriminate against an employee regarding the employee’s compensation, terms, conditions, location, or privileges of employment because the employee, or a person
acting on behalf of the employee, reports or is about to report, verbally or in writing, any activity described in subsection (a) of this section, unless the employee knows or has reason to believe that the report is inaccurate.
No other employee of an employer shall retaliate against another employee because the employee, or a person acting on behalf of the employee, reports or is about to report, verbally or in writing, any activity described in subsection
(a) of this section. No person shall sue, terminate a contract, threaten, or otherwise discriminate against a reporting person regarding the reporting person’s compensation or terms of contract because the reporting person, or
a person acting on behalf of the reporting person, reports or is about to report, verbally or in writing, any activity described in subsection (a) of this section, unless the reporting person knows or has reason to believe that
the report is inaccurate.

Relief for Violation. — Any person injured by a violation of subsection (b) of this section may maintain an action in superior court for damages, an injunction, or other remedies provided in this section against the person who committed the violation
within one year after the occurrence of the alleged violation of this Article.

Remedies. — A court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought pursuant to this section, may order an injunction, damages, reinstatement of the employee, the payment of back wages or payments owed under a contract, full reinstatement of fringe benefits
and seniority rights, costs, reasonable attorneys’ fees, or any combination of these. If an application for a permanent injunction is granted, the person maintaining the action shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees.
If in an action for damages the court finds that the person maintaining the action was injured by a willful violation of subsection (b) of this section, the court shall award as damages three times the amount of actual damages
plus costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees against the individual or individuals found to be in violation of subsection (b) of this section.

Unrelated Unfavorable Action. — It shall not be a violation of this Article for a person to discharge or take any other unfavorable action with respect to an employee who has engaged in protected activity as set forth under this Article if the person
proves by the greater weight of the evidence that it would have taken the same unfavorable action in the absence of the protected activity of the employee.

History.
2012-192, s. 3; 2021-157, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition on contract provisions restricting whistle-blowing related to State Health Plan, see

G.S. 22B-4

.

§ 135-48.16.
Fraud detection and audit programs.

Access to Persons and Records. — In the course of conducting an investigation or an audit under G.S. 135-48.30(a)(9), the Plan, or authorized representatives who are assisting the State Health Plan Division staff, shall have ready access to the following:

Persons, books, records, reports, vouchers, correspondence, files, personnel files, investments, and any other documentation of any employing unit. The Plan shall have the authority to examine and make copies of the information described in this subdivision
only insofar as it directly relates to a specific investigation or audit. The review of State tax returns shall be limited to matters of official business, and the Plan’s report shall not violate the confidentiality provisions
of the tax laws. A confidentiality agreement may be put in place with an agency providing documentation to the Plan.

Persons, records, papers, reports, vouchers, correspondence, books, and any other documentation that is in the possession of any individual, private corporation, institution, association, board, or other organization that pertain to any benefits received,
disbursed, or otherwise handled pursuant to a grant or contract from the federal government that is administered by the State Health Plan, the State, or its political subdivisions. Providers of social and medical services
to a beneficiary shall make copies of records they maintain for services provided to the beneficiary.Authorized representatives who are assisting the State Health Plan Division staff must have a HIPAA business associate
agreement with the State Health Plan and enter into a HIPAA data sharing agreement with any vendor whose records they are copying.

Records of Providers of Social and Medical Services. — Providers of social and medical services who provide ready access to the Plan under subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section shall make copies of records they maintain for services provided
to a beneficiary available to the Plan or to the authorized representatives who are assisting the State Health Plan Division staff. The Plan, or authorized representatives who are assisting the State Health Plan Division staff,
shall request records in writing by providing the name of each beneficiary from whom records are sought, the purpose of the request, the authority for the request, and a reasonable period of time for the production of record copies
by the provider. A provider may charge and the Plan, or authorized representatives who are assisting the State Health Plan Division staff, shall, in accordance with

G.S. 90-411

, pay a reasonable fee to the provider for copies of the records provided.

Fraud Detection and Audit Reports and Work Papers. — The Plan shall maintain for 10 years a complete file of all compliance investigative reports, fraud investigative reports, and reports of other examinations, investigations, surveys, and reviews issued
under the Plan’s authority under G.S. 135-48.30(a)(9). Fraud or compliance investigation work papers and other evidence or related supportive material directly pertaining to the work of the State Health Plan Division of the Department
of State Treasurer shall be retained according to an agreement between the Plan and State Archives. To promote intergovernmental cooperation and avoid unnecessary duplication of fraud investigative effort, and notwithstanding local
unit personnel policies to the contrary, pertinent work papers and other supportive material relating to issued fraud or compliance investigation reports may be, at the discretion of the Executive Administrator of the Plan, and
unless otherwise prohibited by law, made available for inspection by duly authorized representatives of the State and federal government who desire access to, and inspection of, such records in connection with some matter officially
before them, including criminal investigations. Except as provided in this section, or upon an order issued in Wake County Superior Court upon 10 days’ notice and hearing finding that access is necessary to a proper administration
of justice, fraud investigation work papers and related supportive material shall be kept confidential, including any information developed as a part of the investigation.

History.
2017-135, s. 6.

§§ 135-48.17 through 135-48.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Administrative Structure.